foma/sakha_gloss.lexc
!!!sakha_gloss.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols +pos +N +deriv +ag +deriv +dim1 +deriv +dim2 +deriv +dim3 +deriv +dim4 +deriv +dim5 +num +sg +num +pl +case +nom +case +acc +case +part +case +dat +case +abl +case +ins +case +com +case +cmpr



LEXICON Root

N ;

LEXICON N
олень:таба Nstem;
рыба:балык Nstem;
лекарство:эмп Nstem;
океан:байхал Nstem;
письмо:сурук Nstem;
богатство:баай Nstem;
кровать:орон Nstem;


LEXICON Nstem

+pos+N:^ Ninfl;
+pos+N:^ NsourceDerivation;


LEXICON NAdjStem

Ninfl ;


LEXICON NsourceDerivation

Naffix ;


LEXICON Naffix

+deriv+ag:һыт^ Ninfl;
+deriv+dim1:чык^ ;
+deriv+dim2:ка^ Ninfl;
+deriv+dim3:чаан^ Ninfl;
+deriv+dim4:кай^ Ninfl;
+deriv+dim5:ыйа^ Ninfl;


LEXICON Ninfl

+num+sg:0 Ncase;
+num+pl:лар^ Ncase;


LEXICON Ncase

+case+nom:0 #;
+case+acc:ы^ #;
+case+part:та^ #;
+case+dat:га^ #;
+case+abl:тан^ #;
+case+ins:нан^ #;
+case+com:лыын^ #;
+case+cmpr:тааҕар^ #;
